North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 8. Proprietary Schools.
§ 115D-96.
Operating school without license or bond made misdemeanor.

Any person, or each member of any association of persons or each officer of any corporation who opens and conducts a proprietary school without first having obtained the license herein required, and without first having executed the bond, paid the assessments into the Student Protection Fund, or both, as required by law, shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and each day the school continues to be open and operated shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

1955, c. 1372, art. 30, s. 7; 1957, c. 1000; 1961, c. 1175, s. 10; 1981, c. 423, s. 1; 1987, c. 442, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 877, s. 8; 1993, c. 539, s. 894; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2009-562, s. 3; 2011-21, s. 7.

§ 115D-97.
Contracts with unlicensed schools and evidences of indebtedness made null and void.

All contracts entered into by proprietary schools with students or prospective students, and all promissory notes or other evidence of indebtedness taken in lieu of cash payments by such schools shall be null and void unless such schools are duly licensed as required by this Article.

History.

1957, c. 1000; 1961, c. 1175, s. 11; 1981, c. 423, s. 1; 1987, c. 442, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 877, s. 9; 2011-21, s. 8.

§§ 115D-98 through 115D-104.

Reserved for future codification purposes.